Utah statutes.
78A-9-103.   Practicing law without a license prohibited -- Exceptions.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided by law, an individual may not practice law or assume to act or hold himself or herself out to the public as an individual qualified to practice law within this state if that individual:

(a)  is not admitted and licensed to practice law within this state;

(b)  has been disbarred or suspended from the practice of law; or

(c)  is prohibited from practicing law by court order entered pursuant to the courts' inherent powers or published court rule.

(2)  The prohibition against the practice of law described in Subsection (1) shall be enforced by any civil action or proceeding instituted by the Board of Commissioners of the Utah State Bar.

(3)  Nothing in this section prohibits an individual from personally and fully representing that individual's own interests in a cause to which that individual is a party in the individual's own right and not as an assignee.



Enacted by Chapter 236, 2013 General Session

